Idaho, session 2025, S1010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 73, Title 39, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 73
MISCELLANEOUS HEALTH PROVISIONS
39-7301. WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION JURISDICTION. The world health
organization, a specialized agency governed by the world health assembly,
shall have no jurisdiction or control over the government of the state of
Idaho or any agency, branch, department, or function organized under the
government of the state of Idaho with respect to all matters related to,
connected to, or associated with public health within the state of Idaho.
The citizens of Idaho shall not be subject to the terms, conditions, rules,
or regulations promulgated by the world health organization or arising from
any agreement, directive, initiative, or program instituted by agreement
between the federal government and the world health organization.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.